California statutes. Education Code
(b) To the extent allowable under federal law, the department shall regularly identify pupils in foster care and designate those pupils in the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System or any future data system used by the department to collect disaggregated pupil outcome data.

(c) To the extent allowable under federal law, the Superintendent, on or before July 1 of each even-numbered year, shall report to the Legislature and the Governor on the educational outcomes for pupils in foster care at both the individual schoolsite level and school district level. The report shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Individual schoolsite level and school
 district level educational outcome data for each local educational agency that enrolls at least 15 pupils in foster care, each county in which at least 15 pupils in foster care attend school, and for the entire state.

(2) The number of pupils in foster care statewide and by each local educational agency.

(3) The academic achievement of pupils in foster care.

(4) The incidence of suspension and expulsion for pupils in foster care.

(5) Truancy rates, attendance rates, and dropout rates for pupils in foster care.

(d) To the extent allowable under federal law, the department, at least once per
 week, shall do all of the following:

(1) Inform school districts and charter schools of any pupils enrolled in those school districts or charter schools who are in foster care.

(2) Inform county offices of education of any pupils enrolled in schools in the county who are in foster care.

(3) Provide school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools disaggregated data helpful to ensuring pupils in foster care receive appropriate educational supports and services.

(e) (1) For purposes of this section, “pupil in foster care” has the same meaning as “foster youth,” as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 42238.01.

(2) This section does not require the State Department of Social Services to collect, nor share with the department, any information regarding the population described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.01.

(3) (A) For purposes of a dependent child, as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.01, the tribe may notify a local educational agency about the pupil’s status as a dependent child under the court of an Indian tribe, consortium of tribes, or tribal organization. 

(B) A local educational agency shall not require an Indian tribe or tribal court representative to certify that any pupil is a dependent of an Indian tribe, consortium of tribes, or tribal
 organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 287, Sec. 6.   (AB 1055)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.6. The Education Empowerment Act of 1998 [49091.10. - 49091.24.]



  ARTICLE 1. Parental Review [49091.10. - 49091.19.]

49091.10.

(a) All primary supplemental instructional materials and assessments, including textbooks, teacher’s manuals, films, audio and video recordings, and software shall be compiled and stored by the classroom instructor and made available promptly for inspection by a parent or guardian in a reasonable timeframe or in accordance with procedures determined by the governing board of the school district.

(b) A parent or guardian has the right to observe instruction and other school activities that involve his or her child in accordance with procedures determined by the governing board of the school district to ensure the safety of pupils and school personnel and to prevent undue interference with instruction or harassment of school
 personnel. Reasonable accommodation of parents and guardians shall be considered by the governing board of the school district. Upon written request by the parent or guardian, school officials shall arrange for the parental observation of the requested class or classes or activities by that parent or guardian in a reasonable timeframe and in accordance with procedures determined by the governing board of the school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 88, Sec. 24.   (AB 176)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

49091.12.

(a) A pupil may not be compelled to affirm or disavow any particular personally or privately held world view, religious doctrine, or political opinion. This section does not relieve pupils of any obligation to complete regular classroom assignments.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to affect a pupil’s right or ability to obtain confidential medical care or confidential counseling relating to the diagnosis or treatment of a drug- or alcohol-related problem, or mental health treatment or counseling on an outpatient basis, without the consent of his or her parent or guardian. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to restrict the authority of school officials or law enforcement officials to investigate, or intervene in, cases of suspected child abuse.

(c) A pupil may not be tested for a behavioral, mental, or emotional evaluation without the informed written consent of his or her parent or guardian.

(d) A general consent, including medical consent used to approve admission to or involvement in, a special education or remedial program or regular school activity, does not constitute written consent under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1031, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

49091.14.

The curriculum, including titles, descriptions, and instructional aims of every course offered by a public school, shall be compiled at least once annually in a prospectus. Each schoolsite shall make its prospectus available for review upon request. When requested, the prospectus shall be reproduced and made available. School officials may charge for the prospectus an amount not to exceed the cost of duplication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1031, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

49091.16.

It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage pupil-school-parent compacts that are voluntary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1031, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

49091.18.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a school may not require a pupil or a pupil’s family to submit to or participate in any of the following:

(a) Any assessment, analysis, evaluation, or monitoring of the quality or character of the pupil’s home life.

(b) Any form of parental screening or testing.

(c) Any nonacademic home-based counseling program.

(d) Parent training.

(e) Any prescribed family education service plan.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing the screening, testing, or training of public school employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1031, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

49091.19.

No provision of this chapter shall be construed as restricting teachers in the assignment of homework.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1031, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Teacher Rights [49091.24. - 49091.24.]

49091.24.

A teacher shall have the right to refuse to submit to any evaluation or survey conducted by the school district concerning the following:

(a) Personal values, attitudes, and beliefs.

(b) Sexual orientation.

(c) Political affiliations or opinions.

(d) Critical appraisals of other individuals with whom the teacher has a family relationship.

(e) Religious affiliations or beliefs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1031, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Employment of Minors [49100. - 49200.]



  ARTICLE 1. Employment and Attendance [49100. - 49101.]

49100.

No minor having a permit to work and no minor under 18 years of age, who is otherwise required by law to attend school, shall be out of school and unemployed for a period longer than 10 consecutive days while the public schools are in session, but shall enroll and attend school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49101.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any minor who has been graduated from a high school maintaining a four-year course above the eighth grade of elementary schools, or who has had an equal amount of education in a private school or by private tuition, or who has been awarded a certificate of proficiency pursuant to Section 48412 of the Education Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 796.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Permits to Work [49110. - 49120.]

49110.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that school district, charter school, and private school personnel responsible for issuing work permits to pupils have a working knowledge of California labor laws as they relate to minors and be trained to provide pupils with practical personal guidance
 in career education.

(b) Any of the following individuals may issue a work permit to a minor subject to the requirements and conditions of this chapter:

(1) The superintendent of a school district in which the minor resides.

(2) The chief executive officer, or the equivalent position, of a charter school that the minor attends.

(3) A person holding a services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services authorized by the superintendent of the school district or chief executive officer in writing, or a certificated work experience education teacher or coordinator authorized by the superintendent of the school district or chief executive officer in writing.

(4) If the minor resides in a portion of a county not under the jurisdiction of the superintendent of a school district and does not attend a charter
 school, the county superintendent of schools, a person holding a services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services authorized by the county superintendent of schools in writing, or a certificated work experience education teacher or coordinator authorized by the county superintendent of schools in writing
 may issue a work permit.

(5) Subject to the requirements and conditions in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, the principal of a public or private school may issue, or designate another administrator in the school to issue, work permits to pupils who attend the school. If the principal of a public or private school chooses not to issue work permits pursuant to this paragraph, work permits may be issued to pupils attending that school pursuant to paragraph (1), (3), or (4) or Section 49110.1.

(A) A principal who issues a work permit pursuant to this paragraph shall provide a self-certification that he or she understands the requirements in existing law
 for issuing a work permit. The principal shall submit a copy of each work permit he or she issues along with a copy of the application for each work permit to the superintendent of the school district in which the school is located.

(B) The superintendent of a school district may revoke a work permit issued by the principal of a public or private school located within the district if the superintendent becomes aware of any grounds upon which the pupil may be deemed ineligible for a work permit under existing law.

(C) An individual with authority to issue a work permit pursuant to this subdivision shall not issue a work permit to his or her own child.

(c) A work permit shall not be issued until the written request for the permit
 from the parent, guardian, foster parent, caregiver with whom the minor resides, or residential shelter services provider, has been filed with the issuing authority. “Residential shelter services” refers to residential and other support services provided to minors by a governmental agency, a person or agency under contract with a governmental agency to provide these services, an agency receiving funding from community funds, or a licensed community care facility or crisis resolution center on a temporary or emergency basis in a facility that services only minors.

(d) If the certificated person designated to issue work permits by the superintendent of a school district or the chief executive officer, or the equivalent position, of a charter school is not available, and delay in issuing a permit would jeopardize the ability of a pupil to secure work, another person authorized by the
 superintendent of the school district or the chief executive officer, or the equivalent position, of a charter school may issue the work permit.

(e) If a school district or charter school does not employ or contract with a person holding a services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services or with a certificated work experience education teacher or coordinator, the superintendent of the school district or the chief executive officer, or the equivalent position, of a charter school may authorize, in writing, a person who does not hold that credential to issue work permits during periods
 of time in which the superintendent is absent from the district or the chief executive officer is absent from the charter school.

(f) Notwithstanding the hour limitations imposed by this chapter or any other provision of law, the hour limitations that apply to a work permit issued by any of the individuals described in subdivision (b) shall be based on the school calendar of the school the pupil attends.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 214, Sec. 1.   (AB 66)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

49110.1.

The superintendent of any school district may designate the principal or other person having charge of a private school within the district, in which pupils are enrolled pursuant to Section 48222, as a person authorized to issue work permits to pupils of the school, in accordance with this chapter. Where the pupil resides in a portion of the county not under the jurisdiction of the superintendent of any school district, the county superintendent of schools may designate the principal or other person having charge of a private school as the person authorized to issue such work permits. The superintendent of the school district, or the county superintendent of schools as the case may be, shall periodically ascertain that the designated person has complied with the requirements of this chapter pertaining to issuing authorities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 117.)
-------------------------------------------

49110.5.

(a) The week of each year that includes April 28 shall be known as “Workplace Readiness Week.” All public high schools, including charter schools, shall annually observe that week by providing information to pupils on their rights as workers. The topics covered shall include, but are not limited to, all the following:

(1) Local, state, and federal laws regarding each of the following issues:

(A) Prohibitions against misclassification of employees as independent contractors.

(B) Child labor.

(C) Wage and hour protections.

(D) Worker safety.

(E) Workers’ compensation.

(F) Unemployment insurance.

(G) Paid Sick Leave, Paid Family Leave, State Disability Insurance, and the California Family Rights Act.

(H) The right to organize a union in the workplace.

(I) Prohibitions against retaliation by employers when workers exercise these or any other rights guaranteed by law.

(2) The labor movement’s role in winning the protections and benefits described in subparagraphs (A) to (I), inclusive, of paragraph (1).

(3) An introduction
 to state-approved apprenticeship programs in California, how to access them, the variety of programs available, and how they can provide an alternative career path for those who do not attend college.

(b) For pupils in grades 11 and 12, the observances required by this section shall be integrated into the regular school program, consistent with the history-social science framework, but may also include special events after regular school hours. This integration is encouraged, but not required, to occur during Workplace Readiness Week.

(c) (1) Beginning August 1, 2024, any minor seeking the signature of a verifying authority on a Statement of Intent to Employ a Minor and Request for a Work Permit-Certificate of Age under this chapter shall be issued, before or at the time of receiving the signature of the verifying authority, a document clearly explaining
 basic labor rights extended to workers.

(2) Topics covered in this document shall include, but are not limited to, those identified in subparagraphs (A) to (I), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(3) The University of California Berkeley Center for Labor Research and Education is encouraged to produce, with input from bona fide labor organizations, a draft template for the document to be provided to minors, including translations into other languages, including, but not limited to, Spanish, Chinese, Tagalog, Vietnamese, and Korean.

(4) The document shall express these labor rights in plain, natural terminology easily understood by the pupil.

(5) The document shall be in a physical form in English and shall include both a Uniform Resource
 Locator for, and a quick response code linked to, an internet website with electronic versions of the document, and any translated versions of the document, produced by the University of California Berkeley Center for Labor Research and Education pursuant to paragraph (3).

(d) The Superintendent shall annually send a written notice, detailing requirements of Workplace Readiness Week and how teachers may access related instructional materials and other resources, to every public high school, including charter schools, at least one month before Workplace Readiness Week.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 271, Sec. 2.   (AB 800)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

49111.

A permit to work may be issued to any minor over the age of 12 years and under the age of 18 years to be employed on a regular school holiday, during the regular vacation of the public school, during such time as the minor is exempt from compulsory school attendance pursuant to Section 48231, and during the period of a specified occasional public school vacation in any of the establishments or occupations not otherwise prohibited by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1221.)
-------------------------------------------

49112.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), a permit to work may be issued to a minor who has completed the equivalent of the 7th grade in a public school course to work outside of school hours for a period of time not to exceed three hours in any day while school is in session if the minor is 14 or 15 years of age, or four hours in any day in which he or she is required by law to attend school if the minor is 16 or 17 years of age.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a permit to work may be issued, at the school district’s discretion, to a minor 13 years of age if he or she has completed grade 6, has been identified by the school district in which he or she is enrolled as exhibiting the potential to drop out of school, and is a participant in an employment program that is conducted on school premises and sponsored by one or more school districts, provided the program serves to foster the development of an appreciation by the pupil of the importance of education in preparing a pupil for future education and employment. The permit shall limit the period any minor age 13 may work pursuant to this subdivision to two hours on any given day, up to a maximum of four hours each week.

(c) A permit to work may also be issued to a minor age 16 or older to work outside of school hours for a period of time not to exceed eight hours in any day in which the minor is required by law to attend school and which is immediately prior to a nonschoolday.

(d) Nothing in this section shall apply to any minor employed to deliver newspapers to consumers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1189, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

49113.

A permit to work may be issued to a minor who is under the age of 18 years and over the age of 14 years who is regularly enrolled in a high school or community college or who has been assigned to a vocational course in a place of employment, and who will work part time as a properly enrolled pupil in a work experience education course that meets all the requirements of such course as provided in Sections 51760 to 51769, inclusive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49114.

The person authorized to issue permits to work or to employ may issue to any minor a certificate of age when the minor accompanied by his parent, guardian, or other person in control or charge of the minor, presents to the authority, the evidence of age specified in this chapter. The certificate of age shall serve as a permit to employ a minor who is not by law required to attend school, and who is otherwise required to hold a permit to work.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49115.

The permit to employ shall contain:

(a) The name, age, birth date, address and phone number of the minor.

(b) The place and hours of compulsory part-time school attendance for the minor, or statement of exemption therefrom, and the hours of compulsory full-time school attendance for the minor, if the permit is issued for outside of school hours.

(c) The maximum number of hours per day and per week the student may work while school is in session.

(d) The minor’s social security number.

(e) The signature of the minor and the issuing authority.

(f) The date on which the permit expires.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49116.

(a) While school is in session, an employer shall not employ a minor 14 or 15 years of age for more than three hours in any day, nor more than 18 hours in any week, nor during school hours, except that a minor enrolled in and employed pursuant to a school-supervised and school-administered work experience and career exploration program may be employed for no more than 23 hours, any portion of which may be during school hours.

(b) An employer shall not employ a minor 16 or 17 years of age for more than four hours in any day in which that minor is required by law to attend school for 240 minutes or more, except as follows:

(1) The minor is employed in personnel attendance occupations, as defined in the Industrial Welfare Commission Minimum Wage Order No. 15, school-approved work experience, or cooperative vocational education programs.

(2) The minor has been issued a permit to work pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 49112 and is employed in accordance with the provisions of that permit. 

(c) If evidence is shown, to the satisfaction of the authority issuing the permit to work, that the schoolwork or the health of the minor is being impaired by the employment, that authority may revoke the permit.

(d) Nothing in this section shall apply to any minor employed to deliver newspapers to consumers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 887, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

49117.

All permits to work or to employ, all certificates of age, and certificates of health pursuant to this chapter, shall be issued on forms prepared and provided by the Superintendent of Public Instruction. Local school districts authorized to issue permits to work may be authorized by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to produce permits to work.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49118.

Permits to work issued during the school year shall expire five days after the opening of the next succeeding school year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49119.

Nothing in this article shall require a minor to obtain a permit to work in order for such minor to participate in horseback riding exhibitions, contests or events specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1308 of the Labor Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49120.

A work permit shall not be denied on the basis of a pupil’s grades, grade point average, or school attendance if the pupil is applying for the work permit in order to participate in a government-administered employment and training program that will occur during the regular summer recess or vacation of the school that the pupil attends.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 420, Sec. 1.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Permits to Work Full Time [49130. - 49135.]

49130.

A permit to work full time may be issued to a minor under the age of 16 years and over the age of 14 years who holds a diploma of graduation from the prescribed elementary school course under both of the following circumstances:

(a) The permit expires not later than the end of the current school year.

(b) Any of the following conditions:

(1) The parent or guardian of the minor child presents a sworn statement that the parent or guardian of the minor is incapacitated for labor through illness or injury, or that through the death or desertion of the father or mother of the minor, the family is in need of the earnings of the minor and that sufficient aid cannot be secured in any other manner.

(2) The minor is unable to reside with his or her family and the earnings of the minor are necessary for the support of the minor.

(3) The minor is residing with a foster care provider, or guardian receiving foster care funds for the minor, if the provider or guardian obtains written authorization from the minor’s social worker, probation officer, or child protective services worker acting as an officer of the court. A permit may be issued to a minor who is subject to this paragraph only if the child’s case plan documents that the purpose of the employment is to further the goal of emancipation pursuant to Part 6 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 11 of the Family Code, or to enable the minor to gain knowledge of necessary work skills and work habits, and of the responsibilities related to maintaining employment.

The person issuing the permit shall sign a statement that he or she, or a competent person designated by him or her, has investigated the conditions under which the application for the permit has been made and has found that, in his or her judgment, the earnings of the minor are necessary for the family to support the minor or that the earnings of the minor are necessary to support the minor and that sufficient aid cannot be secured in any other manner. Before issuing a work permit to a minor who is subject to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), the person issuing the permit shall sign a statement that he or she has received authorization from the minor’s social worker, probation officer, or child protective services worker.

A minor who applies for a work permit pursuant to this section shall be duly enrolled in a work experience education program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 257, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

49131.

Notwithstanding Section 49130, 49132, or 49134 or subdivision (d) of Section 49133, a permit to work full time may be issued to a minor over the age of 16 and under the age of 18.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49132.

(a) A permit shall not be issued until the minor accompanied by the minor’s parent or guardian appears before the person authorized to issue the permit and submits the minor’s application thereto.

(b) A permit shall not be denied for noncompliance with subdivision (a) if all of the following apply:

(1) The minor’s school is physically closed for an extended period of time because of a natural disaster, pandemic, or other emergency.

(2) The minor’s application is complete and has been successfully submitted electronically.

(3) The minor, accompanied by the minor’s parent or guardian, has attended a video conference with the person issuing the work permit.

(c) This section shall apply only to minors subject to Section
 49130.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 64, Sec. 2.   (AB 908)   Effective September 11, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

49133.

No permit shall be issued until the issuing authority has received, examined, approved, and filed, the following papers duly executed:

(a) The school record of the minor giving age, grade, and attendance for the current term signed by the principal or teacher.

(b) Evidence of age, such as the school record of enrollment, or a certificate of birth, or a baptism certificate duly attested, or a passport, or affidavit of the parent, guardian, or custodian of the minor, such as shall convince the officer that the minor is of the age required by law.

(c) The written statement from a prospective employer that work is waiting for the minor and describing the nature of the work.

(d) A certificate signed by a physician appointed by the school board, or by other public medical officer, stating that the minor has been thoroughly examined by him, and, in his opinion, is physically fit to pursue the work specified. No fee shall be charged the minor for the physical certificate.

This section shall be applicable only to minors subject to Section 49130.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49134.

The parent, guardian, or custodian accompanying the minor shall make oath that his statement of the name, address, birthplace, and age of the minor as entered upon the application for the permit to work are true and correct to the best of his knowledge and belief.

This section shall be applicable only to minors subject to Section 49130.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49135.

The authority issuing any permit to work full time shall immediately notify, in writing, the person in charge of the organization and maintenance of part-time continuation classes of the place of the minor’s prospective employment, and the parent or guardian of the minor shall send the minor to the classes designated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Exceptions [49140. - 49141.]

49140.

Every owner, tenant, or operator of a farm employing thereon as agricultural labor any parent or guardian having minor children in his immediate care and custody shall post at a conspicuous place on the property or place of employment where it may be easily read by those employed, a notice stating that minor children are not allowed to work upon the premises unless legally permitted to do so by law and unless permits to work have been secured by the minor children from duly constituted authorities. All such notices shall be printed in both the English and Spanish languages.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49141.

In order that children may be disciplined and trained in habits of work and industry by their parents, guardians, or other persons standing in the place of parents, nothing in this chapter shall require a permit to work to be issued to any minor or require a permit to employ to be issued to the parent or guardian when the work or intended work to be performed by the minor is for or under the control of his parent or guardian and is performed upon or in connection with the premises owned, operated, or controlled by the parent or guardian. Nothing in this section shall be held to affect existing provisions of law which require permits to work to be issued to minors employed in manufacturing, mercantile, or similar commercial enterprises by their parents or guardians, or to do work which is otherwise forbidden by Section 1294, 1296, or 1308.5 of the Labor Code. All other provisions of law relating to compulsory education shall be effective as to the minor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Compliance [49151. - 49151.]

49151.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to repeal or in any way modify the provisions of Sections 1298, 1390, 1394, 1396, and 1397 of the Labor Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Duties of Employer [49160. - 49165.]

49160.

No person, firm or corporation shall employ, suffer, or permit any minor under the age of 18 years to work in or in connection with any establishment or occupation except as provided in Section 49151 without a permit to employ, issued by the proper educational officers in accordance with law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49161.

Every person, firm, corporation, or agent or officer of a firm or corporation, employing minors under the age of 18 years shall keep on file all permits to employ minors under the age of 18 years during the term of the employment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49162.

The employer of any minor subject to this chapter shall send to the officer authorized to issue the permit to work a written notification of intent to employ a minor. The form of the intent to employ a minor shall be prescribed by the Department of Education and shall be furnished to the employer by the officer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49163.

The notification of intent to employ a minor shall contain:

(a) The name, address, phone number, and social security number of the minor. 

(b) The name, address, phone number, and supervisor at the minor’s place of employment.

(c) The kind of work the minor will perform.

(d) The maximum number of hours per day and per week the student will be expected to work for the employer.

(e) The signatures of the parent or guardian, of the minor, and of the employer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49164.

Permits to work and to employ and certificates of age shall always be open to inspection by supervisors of attendance, probation officers, designees of the Labor Commissioner, and by officers of the Superintendent of Public Instruction. Every permit to work or to employ and every certificate of age shall be subject to cancellation at any time by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Labor Commissioner, or by the person issuing the permit or certificate whenever any person authorized to inspect such permits and certificates finds that the conditions for the legal issuance of the permit or certificate of age do not exist or did not exist at the time the permit or certificate was issued. A permit to work shall be revoked by the issuing authority when he is satisfied that the employment of the minor is impairing the health or education of the minor, or that any provision or condition of the permit is being violated, or that the minor is performing work in violation of any provision of law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49165.

Nothing in this article shall require a person to obtain a permit to employ in order for a minor to participate in horseback riding exhibitions, contests or events specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1308 of the Labor Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Violations [49180. - 49183.]

49180.

If upon inspection or investigation a supervisor of attendance, probation officer, or officer of the Superintendent determines that a person is in violation of any statutory provision or rule or regulation relating to the employment of minors, the Superintendent shall report the violation to the Labor Commissioner. The report shall be made within 48 hours, and shall be in writing, setting forth the fact that the Superintendent has good cause to believe that a statutory provision or rule or regulation is being violated by the person. Upon receipt of the report of violation, the Director of Industrial Relations shall make an inspection or investigation of the violation and shall take action as provided in Section 1287 of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 42.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

49181.

Failure to produce a permit to work is prima facie evidence of the illegal employment of any minor whose permit to work is not produced.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49182.

Any person, firm, corporation, or agent or officer of a firm or corporation, that violates or omits to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter, or that employs or suffers any minor under 18 years of age who is too old to be subject to compulsory full-time school attendance to be employed in violation thereof, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor more than four hundred dollars ($400), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 60 days, or by both such fine and imprisonment for each and every offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 87.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

49183.

Every person authorized to sign any certificate of age or any permit to work or to employ which allows employment of any minor during or outside school hours, during a vacation of the public schools, or upon the regular school holiday who knowingly certifies to any false statement therein, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by a fine of not less than ten dollars ($10) or more than one hundred dollars ($100), or imprisonment for not more than 30 days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 88.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Permit to Work during Extended Emergency School Closure [49200. - 49200.]

49200.

(a) Documentation required pursuant to this chapter, including signatures, may be collected electronically during an extended school closure due to a natural disaster, pandemic, or other emergency.

(b) A work permit shall not be denied based on a pupil’s grades, grade point average, or school attendance when the pupil’s school has been physically closed for an extended time due to a natural disaster, pandemic, or other emergency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 64, Sec. 3.   (AB 908)   Effective September 11, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Pupil Safety [49300. - 49395.]



  ARTICLE 1. School Safety Patrols [49300. - 49307.]

49300.

The governing board of any school district may, subject to such rules and regulations as shall be adopted by the State Board of Education, establish and maintain a school safety patrol in any of the schools of the district for the purpose of assisting school pupils in safely crossing streets and highways adjacent to or near such school.
